Utah statutes.
53-5b-201.   Intrastate firearm manufacturing.

(1)  This chapter applies to a firearm, a firearm action or receiver, a firearm accessory, or ammunition that is manufactured in the state to remain in the state from basic materials that can be manufactured without the inclusion of any significant parts imported into the state.

(2)  This chapter does not apply to:

(a)  a firearm that cannot be carried and used by one person;

(b)  a firearm that has a bore diameter greater than 1-1/2 inches and that uses smokeless powder, not black powder, as a propellant;

(c)  a firearm that discharges two or more projectiles with one activation of the trigger or other firing device, other than a shotgun; or

(d)  ammunition with a projectile that explodes using an explosion of chemical energy after the projectile leaves the firearm.



Enacted by Chapter 5, 2010 General Session

